Nebraska, session 109, LB446.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB446 LB446
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 71-602, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-602 (1) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations prescribing all standard forms for registering with or
reporting to the department and for certification to the public of any
birth, abortion, marriage, annulment, dissolution of marriage, or death
registered in Nebraska. Such forms shall (a) provide for the registration
of vital events as accurately as possible, (b) secure information about
the economic, educational, occupational, and sociological backgrounds of
the individuals involved in the registered events and their parents as a
basis for statistical research or quality improvement in order to reduce
morbidity and mortality and improve the quality of life, (c) accomplish
such duties in a manner which will be uniform with forms for reporting
similar events which have been established by the United States Public
Health Service to the extent such forms are consistent with state law,
and (d) permit other deviations from such forms as will reduce the costs
of gathering information, increase efficiency, or protect the health and
safety of the people of Nebraska without jeopardizing such uniformity.
(2) All information designated by the department on all certificates
as being for health data and statistical research shall be confidential
and may be released only to the United States Public Health Service or
its successor, government health agencies, statewide quality improvement
initiatives, or a researcher utilizing a clear and expedient application
process, as approved by the department in accordance with its rules and
regulations. The department shall may publish at least annually on its
website analyses of any information received on the forms for scientific
and public health purposes in such a manner as to assure that the
identity of any individual cannot be ascertained. The release of such
information pursuant to this section shall not make otherwise
confidential information a public record.
Sec. 2. Original section 71-602, Reissue Revised Statutes of
-2-

LB446 LB446
2025 2025
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-